California, session 20252026, AB2696.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 30001 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30001. The Legislature hereby finds and declares: declares all of the following:(a) That the California coastal zone is a distinct and valuable natural resource of vital and enduring interest to all the people and exists as a delicately balanced ecosystem.(b) That the permanent protection of the state’s natural and scenic resources is a paramount concern to present and future residents of the state and nation.(c) That to promote the public safety, health, and welfare, and to protect public and private property, wildlife, marine fisheries, and other ocean resources, and the natural environment, it is necessary to protect the ecological balance of the coastal zone and prevent its deterioration and destruction.(d) That existing developed uses, and future developments that are carefully planned and developed consistent with the policies of this division, are essential to the economic and social well-being of the people of this state and especially to working persons employed within the coastal zone.